District of Columbia statutes.
10-1141.07

Enforcement.

(a)

Civil fines and penalties may be imposed as sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter or any rules issued in accordance with this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.] (“Civil Infractions Act”). Enforcement and adjudication of an infraction shall be pursuant to the Civil Infractions Act.

(b)

The Mayor may also enforce this subchapter or any rules issued in accordance with this subchapter pursuant to § 50-921.19(a), (c), (d), (e), and (f).

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 607
as added Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-207, § 8, 61 DCR 12690

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-207: Section 12(a) of D.C. Law 20-207 provided that §§ 2(a), 2(b)(1), 2(b)(2)(A), 2(b)(2)(B), 2(b)(2)(C), 2(c), 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, and 11 shall apply as of March 11, 2015.